Nebraska, session 109, LB360.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB360 LB360
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section, homeowner association
means a nonprofit corporation duly incorporated under the laws of the
State of Nebraska for the purpose of enforcing the restrictive covenants
established upon the real property legally described in the articles of
incorporation which is located within the corporate limits of a
municipality, each member of which is an owner of a lot located within
the plat or subdivision and, by virtue of membership or ownership of a
lot, is obligated to pay costs for the administration, maintenance, and
care of the common area within the plat or subdivision. A homeowner
association includes associations of residential homeowners,
nonresidential property owners, or both.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by this section, a homeowner
association may not adopt or enforce a restrictive covenant that
prohibits a property owner from displaying political signs on the owner's
property advertising a candidate or a ballot measure in an election for
which such signs pertain for the period beginning ninety days before the
election and ending ten days after the election.
(3) This section does not prohibit the adoption or enforcement of a
covenant:
(a) Requiring a sign to be mounted to the ground;
(b) Limiting a property owner to displaying only one sign for each
candidate or each ballot measure; or
(c) Prohibiting a sign that:
(i) Contains roofing material, siding, paving materials, flora, one
or more balloons or lights, or any other similar building, landscaping,
or nonstandard decorative component;
(ii) Is attached in any way to plant material, a traffic control
sign or device, a light pole, a trailer, a vehicle, or any other similar
object;
(iii) Includes the painting of architectural surfaces;
(iv) Threatens public health or safety;
-2-

LB360 LB360
2025 2025
(v) Is larger than four feet by six feet;
(vi) Contains language, graphics, or any display that would be
offensive to the ordinary person;
(vii) Is accompanied by music or other sounds or by streamers or is
otherwise distracting to passing motorists; or
(viii) Violates any law.
(4) A homeowner association may remove a sign that is displayed in
violation of any restrictive covenant not prohibited by this section.
-3-